North Dakota, session 69, HB1163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-36 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Legacy fund school construction assistance loan fund - Bank of North Dakota -
School construction projects - Continuing appropriation .
1. The legacy fund school construction assistance loan fund is a special loan fund
administered by the Bank of North Dakota. Moneys in the fund are appropriated on a
continuing basis to the Bank of North Dakota for loan disbursements and
administrative costs. The fund must be audited annually pursuant to section 6 - 09 - 29 ,
and the cost of the audit must be paid from the fund.
2. The Bank of North Dakota may adopt policies and establish guidelines to administer
the legacy fund school construction assistance loan fund in accordance with this
section.
3. The Bank of North Dakota shall transfer all payments of principal and interest paid on
loans made from the legacy fund school construction assistance loan fund to the
legacy fund. The Bank may use a portion of the interest paid on the outstanding loans
as a servicing fee to pay for administrative costs, which may not exceed one - half o f
one percent of the amount of the outstanding loans .
4. To be eligible for a loan under this section, the board of a school district shall:
Page No. 1 25.0573.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. Propose a new construction or remodeling project with a cost of at least
one million dollars and an expected utilization of at least thirty years ;
b. Obtain the approval of the superintendent of public instruction for the project
under section 15.1 - 36 - 01 ;
c. (1) Publish in the official newspaper of the district the information regarding the
proposed estimated additional millage and the dollar increase per
one thousand dollars of taxable valuation in accordance with section
21 - 03 - 13 along with the notice of the election in accordance with section
21 - 03 - 12 or along with the initial resolution in accordance with subsection 7
of section 21 - 03 - 07; and
(2) Post the information on the school district's website before the date of the
election or during the protest period in accordance with chapter 21 - 03 ;
d. Receive authorization for a bond issuance in accordance with chapter 21 - 03; and
e. Submit a completed application to the superintendent of public instruction.
5. The superintendent of public instruction shall review loan applications based on a
prioritization system that includes a review of all applications filed during the
twelve - month period preceding April first and gives consideration to :
a. Student occupancy and academic needs in the district;
b. The age of existing structures to be replaced or remodeled;
c. Building design proposals based on safety and vulnerability assessments;
d. Community support;
e. Cost; and
f. Any other criteria established by the superintendent of public instruction, after
consultation with an interim committee appointed by the legislative management.
6. If the superintendent of public instruction approves the loan, the Bank of North Dakota
shall issue a loan from the legacy fund school construction assistance loan fund. For
loans made under this section:
a. School districts may apply for loan amounts up to a maximum of ten million
dollars for every one thousand students enrolled in the school district. School
districts with enrollments of one thousand students or less may apply for loan
amounts up to a maximum of ten million dollars. However, if a school district's
Page No. 2 25.0573.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
unobligated general fund balance on the preceding June thirtieth exceeds the
limitation under section 15.1 - 27 - 35.3, the loan amount under this section may no t
exceed eighty percent of the maximum loan amount;
b. The term of the loan is twenty years, unless the board of the school district
requests a shorter term in the written loan application;
c. The interest rate of the loan may not exceed one percent per year; and
d. A district with a school construction loan secured on the open bond market may
apply to refinance the loan when callable with the legacy fund school construction
assistance loan fund under this subsection.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 21-10-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
21-10-11. Legacy and budget stabilization fund advisory board.
1. The legacy and budget stabilization fund advisory board is created to develop
recommendations for the investment of funds in the legacy fund and the budget
stabilization fund to present to the state investment board.
2. The goal of investment for the legacy fund is principal preservation and growth while
maximizing total return for an appropriate level of risk and to provide a direct benefit to
the state by investing a portion of the principal in the state. Preference must be given
to qualified investment firms and financial institutions with a presence in the state for
investment of the legacy fund.
3. The board shall determine the asset allocation for the investment of the principal of the
legacy fund including:
a. A target allocation of seven hundred million one billion seven hundred million
dollars to fixed income investments within the state, including:
(1) Up to one hundred fifty million dollars for infrastructure loans to political
subdivisions under section 6-09-49.1. The net return to the legacy fund
under this paragraph must be fixed at a target rate of one and one-half
percent;
(2) Up to one billion dollars for loans from the legacy fund school construction
assistance loan fund under section 1 of this Act. The net return to the legacy
fund under this paragraph must be fixed at a target rate of one - half percent ;
Page No. 3 25.0573.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(2)(3) A minimum of four hundred million dollars for the Bank of North Dakota's
certificate of deposit match program with an interest rate fixed at the
equivalent yield of United States treasury bonds having the same term, up
to a maximum term of twenty years; and
(3)(4) Other qualified fixed income investments within the state based on
guidelines developed by the legacy and budget stabilization fund advisory
board.
b. A target allocation of six hundred million dollars to equity investments in the state,
including:
(1) Investments in one or more equity funds, venture capital funds, or
alternative investment funds with a primary strategy of investing in emerging
or expanding companies in the state. Equity investments under this
paragraph must:
(a) Be managed by qualified investment firms, financial institutions, or
equity funds which have a strategy to invest in qualified companies
operating or seeking to operate in the state and which have a direct
connection to the state; and
(b) Have a benchmark investment return equal to the five-year average
net return for the legacy fund, excluding in-state investments; and
(2) Other eligible investments under this subdivision based on guidelines
developed by the legacy and budget stabilization fund advisory board.
4. The board consists of three members of the senate appointed by the senate majority
leader, three members of the house of representatives appointed by the house
majority leader, the president of the Bank of North Dakota or designee, the tax
commissioner or designee, the director of the office of management and budget or
designee, and the state treasurer or designee. The board shall select a member from
the senate or house of representatives to serve as chairman for no more than one
consecutive year and must meet at the call of the chairman.
5. The board shall report at least semiannually to the budget section.
6. Legislative members are entitled to receive compensation and expense
reimbursement as provided under section 54-03-20 and reimbursement for mileage as
Page No. 4 25.0573.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
provided by law for state officers. The legislative council shall pay the compensation
and expense reimbursement for the legislative members.
7. The legislative council shall provide staff services to the legacy and budget
stabilization fund advisory board.
8. The staff and consultants of the state retirement and investment office shall advise the
board in developing asset allocation and investment policies.
9. The board may develop a process to select a member of the board who is not a
member of the state investment board to serve on the state investment board in a
nonvoting capacity.
Page No. 5 25.0573.01000